Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.15, is amended to read: 120B.15 GIFTED AND TALENTED STUDENTS PROGRAMS AND SERVICES. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Assessment and identification. new text end (a) School districts deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end identify students, locally develop programs and services addressing instructional and affective needs, provide staff development, and evaluate programs to provide gifted and talented students with challenging and appropriate educational programs and services. (b) School districts must adopt guidelines for assessing and identifying students for participation in gifted and talented programs and services consistent with section 120B.11, subdivision 2, clause (2). The guidelines deleted text begin should include the use ofdeleted text end new text begin must requirenew text end : new text begin (1) universal screening for all students in targeted grades; new text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (2) new text end multiple and objective criteria; and deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end assessments and procedures that are valid and reliable, fair, and based on current theory and research. Assessments and procedures deleted text begin shoulddeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be sensitive to underrepresented groups, includingdeleted text begin ,deleted text end but not limited todeleted text begin ,deleted text end low-income, minority, twice-exceptional, and English learners. (c) new text begin A school district must screen all students under paragraph (b), clause (1), at least twice by the end of grade 5, including for any gifted and talented programs or services not previously identified. Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, a school district must use a screening instrument or procedure approved by the commissioner. No later than July 1, 2027, the commissioner must publish a list of approved screening instruments and procedures. The commissioner may periodically revise the list of approved screening instruments and procedures.new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Academic acceleration; early admission. new text end new text begin (a) new text end School districts must adopt procedures for the academic acceleration of gifted and talented students consistent with section 120B.11, subdivision 2, clause (2). These procedures must include how the district will: (1) assess a student's readiness and motivation for new text begin academic new text end acceleration; and (2) match the level, complexity, and pace of the curriculum to a student to achieve the deleted text begin bestdeleted text end new text begin most effectivenew text end type of academic acceleration deleted text begin for that studentdeleted text end . new text begin (b) A school district's procedures under paragraph (a) must also include criteria that help the school district identify students for: new text end new text begin (1) single subject acceleration under which a student advances in one or more specific subject areas based on the student's academic readiness and proficiency; and new text end new text begin (2) grade acceleration under which a student advances whole grade levels based on an assessment of the student's academic readiness, proficiency, and social-emotional maturity. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end School districts must adopt procedures consistent with section 124D.02, subdivision 1, for early admission to kindergarten or first grade of gifted and talented learners consistent with section 120B.11, subdivision 2, clause (2). The procedures must be sensitive to underrepresented groups. new text begin (d) A school district is encouraged to integrate gifted and talented programs and services under this section with the multitiered system of support framework, if one has been adopted by the district. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Professional development. new text end new text begin School districts must provide staff with ongoing professional development and training on the requirements of this section. The training must be updated regularly to incorporate current research and best practices. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Evaluation. new text end new text begin At least twice each year, school districts must evaluate the effectiveness of their gifted and talented programs and services. The evaluation must include information gathered from students, parents, and teachers. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reporting requirements. new text end new text begin School districts must report their expenditures on gifted and talented programs and services to the commissioner in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2025-2026 school year and later. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.36, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. School performance reports and public reporting. (a) The commissioner shall report: (1) student academic performance data under section 120B.35, subdivisions 2 and 3; (2) academic progress consistent with federal expectations; (3) school safety and student engagement and connection under section 120B.35, subdivision 3, paragraph (d); (4) rigorous coursework under section 120B.35, subdivision 3, paragraph (c)new text begin , and participation in gifted and talented programs under section 120B.15, including information about the number of students identified for advanced academics, enrichment, full-time services, grade acceleration or subject acceleration, and expenditures on each category of programmingnew text end ; (5) the percentage of students under section 120B.35, subdivision 3, paragraph (b), clause (2), whose progress and performance levels are meeting career and college readiness benchmarks under sections 120B.307 and 120B.35, subdivision 3, paragraph (e); (6) longitudinal data on the progress of eligible districts in reducing disparities in students' academic achievement and realizing racial and economic integration under section 124D.861; (7) the acquisition of English, and where practicable, native language academic literacy, including oral academic language, and the academic progress of all English learners enrolled in a Minnesota public school course or program who are currently or were previously counted as English learners under section 124D.59; (8) two separate student-to-teacher ratios that clearly indicate the definition of teacher consistent with sections 122A.06 and 122A.15 for purposes of determining these ratios; (9) staff characteristics excluding salaries; (10) student enrollment demographics; (11) foster care status, including all students enrolled in a Minnesota public school course or program who are currently or were previously in foster care, student homelessness, and district mobility; and (12) extracurricular activities. (b) The school performance report for a school site and a school district must include school performance reporting information and calculate proficiency rates as required by the most recently reauthorized Elementary and Secondary Education Act. (c) The commissioner shall develop, annually update, and post on the department website school performance reports consistent with paragraph (a) and section 120B.11. (d) The commissioner must make available performance reports by the beginning of each school year. (e) A school or district may appeal its results in a form and manner determined by the commissioner and consistent with federal law. The commissioner's decision to uphold or deny an appeal is final. (f) School performance data are nonpublic data under section 13.02, subdivision 9, until the commissioner publicly releases the data. The commissioner shall annually post school performance reports to the department's public website no later than September 1, except in years when the reports reflect new performance standards. The commissioner shall post the school performance reports no later than October 1 in years with new performance standards for academic standards-based assessments, and no later than November 1 in years with new performance standards adopted under Minnesota Rules, part 3501.1200, for English language proficiency assessments. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, for school performance reports published on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.10, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Gifted and talented revenue. Gifted and talented revenue for each district equals the district's adjusted pupil units for that school year times deleted text begin $13deleted text end new text begin $.......new text end . A school district must reserve gifted and talented revenue and, consistent with section 120B.15, must spend the revenue only to: (1) identify gifted and talented students; (2) provide education programs new text begin or services new text end for gifted and talented students; or (3) provide staff development to prepare teachers to best meet the unique needs of gifted and talented students. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue in fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin General education aid. new text end new text begin (a) For general education aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.13, subdivision 4: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The 2026 appropriation includes $....... for fiscal year 2025 and $....... for fiscal year 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The 2027 appropriation includes $....... for fiscal year 2026 and $....... for fiscal year 2027. new text end